Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB6139.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 10a. (1) In addition to the requirements under section 10, an application for a building permit that is for a data center must include an acoustic engineering report conducted by an acoustic engineer. The acoustic engineering report must include all of the following information: (a) Before construction of the data center begins, a baseline for the ambient noise levels along the property boundaries where the data center will be located and the surrounding residential structures. (b) A model of the operational noise that the data center is projected to produce. The model must be completed in accordance with standards published by the International Organization for Standardization in ISO 9613-2. (c) A model of the noise that the construction of the data center is projected to produce. (d) The differences in the data center's projected ambient noise levels during the hours of 7:00 a.m. to 5:00 p.m. and its projected ambient noise levels during the hours of 6:00 p.m. to 6:00 a.m. (e) A comparison of the data center's operational noise levels determined under subdivision (b) and any noise ordinance of the local unit of government where the data center will be located. If the local unit of government does not have a noise ordinance, the comparison must be made to a nationally recognized standard, as determined by the department. (2) An enforcing agency that receives an acoustic engineering report under this section shall provide that report to the Michigan public service commission and the local unit of government where the data center will be located. The enforcing agency must comply with the requirements of this subsection before it issues a building permit. (3) As used in this section: (a) "Acoustic engineer" means an acoustic engineer who is licensed as a professional engineer under article 20 of the occupational code, 1980 PA 299, MCL 339.2001 to 339.2014. (b) "Data center" means a facility that is composed of 1 or more buildings and that is designed and intended to house, and does house, data center equipment to centralize the storage and processing of data. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act takes effect 180 days after the date it is enacted into law. Enacting section 2. This amendatory act does not take effect unless all of the following bills of the 103rd Legislature are enacted into law: (a) Senate Bill No. ____ (request no. S06933'26) or House Bill No. 6135 (request no. H06933'26). (b) Senate Bill No. ____ (request no. S06939'26) or House Bill No. 6137 (request no. H06939'26). (c) Senate Bill No. ____ (request no. S06942'26) or House Bill No. 6140 (request no. H06942'26). (d) Senate Bill No. ____ (request no. S06943'26) or House Bill No. 6142 (request no. H06943'26). (e) Senate Bill No. ____ (request no. S06965'26) or House Bill No. 6138 (request no. H06965'26). (f) Senate Bill No. ____ (request no. S07181'26) or House Bill No. 6141 (request no. H07181'26).